Utah statutes.
63G-6-1001.   Felony to accept emolument.
Any person acting as a procurement officer for the state of Utah or any
subdivision thereof, or who in any official capacity participates in the
procurement of any supplies, services, construction, real property, or
insurance for any such political units, is guilty of a felony if the person
asks, receives, or offers to receive any emolument, gratuity, contribution,
loan, or reward, or any promise thereof, either for the person's own use or
the use or benefit of any other person or organization from any person
interested in the sale of such supplies, services, construction, real
property, or insurance.
